apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix
<pardef n="ključ__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>eva</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="stri/c__n"   >
    <e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>cu</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>če</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>cu</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>cem</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>čevi</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>čeva</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>čevima</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>čeve</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ce</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>čevi</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>čevima</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>čevima</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>cima</l><r>c<s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kralj__n"   >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>eva</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- 2-syllable -->
<pardef n="majstor__n"   >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="odmor__n"   >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ključ"><i>ključ</i><par n="ključ__n" /></e>
<e lm="stric"><i>stri</i><par n="stri/c__n" /></e>
<e lm="kralj"><i>kralj</i><par n="kralj__n" /></e>
<e lm="majstor"><i>majstor</i><par n="majstor__n" /></e>
<e lm="domaćin"><i>domaćin</i><par n="majstor__n" /></e>
<e lm="odmor"><i>odmor</i><par n="odmor__n" /></e>
<e lm="narod"><i>narod</i><par n="odmor__n" /></e>
